Utah statutes.
78B-3-423.   Affidavit of merit.
(1) (a)  Before a claimant may receive a certificate of compliance under
Sections 78B-3-416 and 78B-3-418, a claimant shall file an affidavit of merit
under this section:
(i)  within 60 days of the date of the panel's opinion, if the claimant
receives a finding from the pre-litigation panel in accordance with Section
78B-3-418 of non-meritorious for either:
(A)  the claim of breach of applicable standard of care; or
(B)  that the breach of care was the proximate cause of injury;
(ii)  within 60 days of the expiration of the time limit in Subsection
78B-3-416(3)(b)(ii), if a pre-litigation hearing is not held within the time
limits under Subsection 78B-3-416(3)(b)(ii); or
(iii)  within 30 days of the division's determination under Subsection
78B-3-416(3)(d)(ii)(B), if the division makes a determination under Subsection
78B-3-416(3)(d)(ii)(B).
(b)  A claimant who is required to file an affidavit of merit under Subsection
(1)(a) shall:
(i)  file the affidavit of merit with the division; and
(ii)  serve each defendant with the affidavit of merit in accordance with
Subsection 78B-3-412(3).
(2)  The affidavit of merit shall:
(a)  be executed by the claimant's attorney or the claimant if the claimant is
proceeding pro se, stating that the affiant has consulted with and reviewed
the facts of the case with a health care provider who has determined after a
review of the medical record and other relevant material involved in the
particular action that there is a reasonable and meritorious cause for the
filing of a medical liability action; and
(b)  include an affidavit signed by a health care provider who meets the
requirements of Subsection (3), which states that in the health care
provider's opinion:
(i)  there are reasonable grounds to believe that the applicable standard of
care was breached;
(ii)  the breach was a proximate cause of the injury claimed in the notice of
intent to commence action; and
(iii)  the reasons for the health care provider's opinion.
(c)  The statement required in Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall be waived if the
claimant received an opinion that there was a breach of the applicable
standard of care under Subsection 78B-3-418(2)(a)(i).
(3)  A health care provider who signs the affidavit of merit under Subsection
(2) shall:
(a)  if none of the respondents is a physician licensed under Title 58,
Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or an osteopathic physician licensed
under Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, hold a
current unrestricted license issued by the appropriate licensing authority of
Utah or another state in the same specialty or of the same class of license as
the respondents; or
(b)  if at least one of the respondents is a physician licensed under Title
58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or an osteopathic physician
licensed under Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act,
hold a current unrestricted license issued by the appropriate licensing
authority of Utah or another state to practice medicine in all its branches.
(4)  A claimant's attorney or claimant may obtain up to a 60-day extension to
file the affidavit of merit if:
(a)  the claimant or the claimant's attorney submits a signed affidavit for
extension with notice to the division attesting to the fact that the claimant
is unable to submit an affidavit of merit as required by this section because:
(i)  a statute of limitations would impair the action; and
(ii)  the affidavit of merit could not be obtained before the expiration of
the statute of limitations; and
(b)  the claimant or claimant's attorney submits the affidavit for extension
to each named respondent in accordance with Subsection 78B-3-412(3) no later
than 60 days after the date specified in Subsection (1)(a)(i).
(5) (a)  A claimant or claimant's attorney who submits allegations in an
affidavit of merit that are found to be without reasonable cause and untrue,
based on information available to the plaintiff at the time the affidavit was
submitted to the division, is liable to the defendant for the payment of
reasonable expenses and reasonable attorney fees actually incurred by the
defendant or the defendant's insurer.
(b)  An affidavit of merit is not admissible, and cannot be used for any
purpose, in a subsequent lawsuit based on the claim that is the subject of the
affidavit, except for the purpose of establishing the right to recovery under
Subsection (5)(c).
(c)  A court, or arbitrator under Section 78B-3-421, may award costs and
attorney fees under Subsection (5)(a) if the defendant files a motion for
costs and attorney fees within 60 days of the judgment or dismissal of the
action in favor of the defendant.  The person making a motion for attorney
fees and costs may depose and examine the health care provider who prepared
the affidavit of merit.
(6)  If a claimant or the claimant's attorney does not file an affidavit of
merit as required by this section, the division may not issue a certificate of
compliance for the claimant and the malpractice action shall be dismissed by
the court.
(7)  This section applies to a cause of action that arises on or after July 1,
2010.
